Utah statutes.
19-5-108.   Discharge permits -- Requirements and procedure for issuance.
(1)  The board may prescribe conditions for and require the submission of
plans, specifications, and other information to the executive secretary in
connection with the issuance of discharge permits.
(2)  Each discharge permit shall have a fixed term not exceeding five years.
Upon expiration of a discharge permit, a new permit may be issued by the
executive secretary as authorized by the board after notice and an opportunity
for public hearing and upon condition that the applicant meets or will meet
all applicable requirements of this chapter, including the conditions of any
permit granted by the board.
(3)  The board may require notice to the executive secretary of the
introduction of pollutants into publicly-owned treatment works and
identification to the executive secretary of the character and volume of any
pollutant of any significant source subject to pretreatment standards under
Subsection 307(b) of the federal Clean Water Act.  The executive secretary
shall provide in the permit for compliance with  pretreatment standards.
(4)  The board may impose as conditions in permits for the discharge of
pollutants from publicly-owned treatment works appropriate measures to
establish and insure compliance by industrial users with any system of user
charges required under this chapter or the rules adopted under it.
(5)  The board may apply and enforce against industrial users of publicly-
owned treatment works, toxic effluent standards and pretreatment standards for
the introduction into the treatment works of pollutants which interfere with,
pass through, or otherwise are incompatible with the treatment works.
